Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-3402
Definitions.

For purposes of the Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer
on Death Act:

(1) Beneficiary means a person that receives property under
a transfer on death deed;

(2) Designated beneficiary means a person designated to receive
property in a transfer on death deed;

(3) Disinterested
witness to a transfer on death deed means any individual who acts as a witness
to a transfer on death deed at the date of its execution and who is not a
designated beneficiary or an heir, a child, or a spouse of a designated beneficiary;

(4) Joint owner means an individual
who owns property concurrently with one or more other individuals with a right
of survivorship. The term includes a joint tenant. The term does not include
a tenant in common without a right of survivorship;

(5) Person means an individual,
a corporation, an estate, a trustee of a trust, a partnership, a limited liability
company, an association, a joint venture, a public corporation, a government
or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal
or commercial entity;

(6) Property means an interest
in real property located in this state which is transferable on the death
of the owner;

(7) Transfer on death deed
means a deed authorized under the Nebraska Uniform Real Property Transfer
on Death Act; and

(8) Transferor means an individual
who makes a transfer on death deed.

Laws 2012, LB536, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB345, § 2.